apertium-ces-ces.ces_han.dix
    <pardef n="lid/i__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>é</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>em</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>é</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mi</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ech</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>é</l>
        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="člově/k__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kem</l>
        <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>če</l>
        <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ítě__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ítě</l>
        <r>ítě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ěti</l>
        <r>ítě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ítěte</l>
        <r>ítě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ětí</l>
        <r>ítě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ítěti</l>
        <r>ítě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ětem</l>
        <r>ítě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ítě</l>
        <r>ítě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ěti</l>
        <r>ítě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ítě</l>
        <r>ítě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ěti</l>
        <r>ítě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ítěti</l>
        <r>ítě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ětech</l>
        <r>ítě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ítětem</l>
        <r>ítě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ětmi</l>
        <r>ítě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="boxe/r__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>r</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ři</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ra</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rů</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rovi</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rům</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ra</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ry</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>re</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ři</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rovi</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rech</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rem</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ry</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="boxer"><i>boxe</i><par n="boxe/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dítě"><i>d</i><par n="d/ítě__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lidi"><i>lid</i><par n="lid/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="člověk"><i>člově</i><par n="člově/k__n"/></e>
